North Dakota, session 69, HB1200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-21-02.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
15.1-21-02.2. High school graduation - Minimum requirements. (Effective through July 31,
2025)
1. Except as provided in section 15.1-21-02.3 and subsection 2, the following twenty-two units of
high school coursework constitute the minimum requirement for high school graduation:
a. Four units of English language arts from a sequence that includes literature, composition,
and speech;
b. Three units of mathematics, which may include one unit of computer science approved
by the superintendent of public instruction;
c. Three units of science, consisting of:
(1) (a) One unit of biology;
(b) One unit of chemistry; and
(c) One unit of physics; or
(2) (a) One unit of biology;
(b) One unit of physical science; and
(c) One unit or two one-half units of any other science which may include one
unit of computer science or cybersecurity approved by the superintendent of
public instruction;
d. Three units of social studies, including:
(1) One unit of United States history;
(2) (a) One-half unit of United States government and one-half unit of economics; or
(b) One unit of problems of democracy; and
(3) One unit or two one-half units of any other social studies, which may include civics,
civilization, geography and history, multicultural studies, North Dakota studies,
psychology, sociology, and world history;
e. (1) One unit of physical education; or
(2) One-half unit of physical education and one-half unit of health;

H. B. NO. 1200 - PAGE 2
f. Three units of:
(1) Foreign languages;
(2) Native American languages;
(3) Fine arts; or
(4) Career and technical education courses; and
g. Any five additional units.
2. If approved by the board of a school district or nonpublic school, a school district or nonpublic
school may develop eligibility criteria or programmatic requirements to allow a passing score
on the relevant portions of the GED assessment to receive credit for the corresponding
requirements of subdivisions a through d of subsection 1.
High school graduation - Minimum requirements. (Effective after July 31, 2025)
1. Except as provided in section 15.1-21-02.3 and subsection 2, the following twenty-two units of
high school coursework constitute the minimum requirement for high school graduation:
a. Four units of English language arts from a sequence that includes literature, composition,
and speech;
b. Three units of mathematics, which may include one unit of computer science approved
by the superintendent of public instruction;
c. Three units of science, consisting of:
(1) (a) One unit of biology;
(b) One unit of chemistry; and
(c) One unit of physics; or
(2) (a) One unit of biology;
(b) One unit of physical science; and
(c) One unit or two one-half units of any other science which may include one
unit of computer science or cybersecurity approved by the superintendent of
public instruction;
d. Three units of social studies, including:
(1) One unit of United States history, including Native American tribal history;
(2) (a) One-half unit of United States government and one-half unit of economics; or
(b) One unit of problems of democracy; and
(3) One unit or two one-half units of any other social studies, which may include civics,
civilization, geography and history, multicultural studies, North Dakota studies,
psychology, sociology, and world history;
e. (1) One unit of physical education; or
(2) One-half unit of physical education and one-half unit of health;
f. Three units of:

H. B. NO. 1200 - PAGE 3
(1) Foreign languages;
(2) Native American languages;
(3) Fine arts; or
(4) Career and technical education courses;
g. Any five additional units; and
h. One unit of computer science or cybersecurity whether under subdivision b, c, or both.
i. The requirements of subdivision h are waived if the student has completed a computer
science and cybersecurity integration plan approved by the school board.
2. If approved by the board of a school district or nonpublic school, a school district or nonpublic
school may develop:
a. Develop eligibility criteria or programmatic requirements to allow a passing score on the
relevant portions of the GED assessment to receive credit for the corresponding
requirements of subdivisions a through d of subsection 1.
b. Establish a policy to allow a student to receive credit for no more than one unit under
subsection 1 for completing an alternative course, including an elective course or
dua l - credit course, if the student demonstrates an emergent circumstance .

H. B. NO. 1200 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1200.
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 0 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State